Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-105
Soldiers burial grounds; joint control.

Such soldiers burial grounds shall at all times be subject to all rules and regulations of Wyuka Cemetery; all such soldiers burial grounds selected and appropriated prior to January 1, 1927, shall be under the joint control of the trustees of Wyuka Cemetery and such committee as shall be designated by the Lincoln, Nebraska, post of the Grand Army of the Republic, so long as there shall be a post of the Grand Army of the Republic in Lincoln, Nebraska; and all such soldiers burial grounds selected and appropriated on or after January 1, 1927, shall be under the joint control of the trustees of Wyuka Cemetery and of such officers or committees as shall be from time to time appointed for that purpose by William Lewis Camp of United Spanish War Veterans, by Lincoln Post No. 3, American Legion, Department of Nebraska, and by such other war veterans local body as shall hereafter be designated by the trustees as provided in section 12-104.

Laws 1927, c. 197, § 5, p. 563;

C.S.1929, § 13-105;

R.S.1943, § 12-105.